Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.330

Ordinances granting franchises—Requisites.

No ordinance or resolution granting any franchise for any purpose shall be passed by the council on the day of its introduction, nor within five days thereafter, nor at any other than a regular meeting, and no such ordinance or resolution shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the vote of at least three councilmembers. The town council may require a bond in a reasonable amount from any persons and corporations obtaining a franchise from the town conditioned for the faithful performance of the conditions and terms of the franchise and providing a recovery on the bond in case of failure to perform the terms and conditions of the franchise.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2063; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.330. Prior: (i) 1890 p 201 s 153, part; RRS s 9174, part. (ii) 1907 c 228 s 1, part; RRS s 9199, part.]